Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.280

Voting for directors—Cumulative voting.

(1) Shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise or as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. A statement included in the articles of incorporation that "[all] [a designated voting group of] shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors," or words of similar import, means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and to cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

(2) With respect to a corporation formed before January 1, 2020, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, shareholders entitled to vote at any election of directors are entitled to cumulate votes by multiplying the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and to cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

(3) Shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

(a) The meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

(b) A shareholder who has the right to cumulate the shareholder's votes gives notice to the corporation not less than seventy-two hours before the time set for the meeting of the shareholder's intent to cumulate votes during the meeting, and if one shareholder gives this notice all other shareholders in the same voting group participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

(4) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or in a bylaw adopted under RCW 23B.10.205, in any election of directors the candidates elected are those receiving the largest numbers of votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election, up to the number of directors to be elected by such shares.

[ 2019 c 141 s 3; 2009 c 189 s 21; 1989 c 165 s 76.]